Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
CHAPTER 194A Cabinet for Health and Family Services

194A.001.
Use of Kentucky Public Health Improvement Plan.

Public health stakeholders can be expected to use the Kentucky Public Health Improvement Plan in the following ways:

As a guide for public health and local public health departments to plan their activities and budget their resources.

As a guide for public health to educate the public about the activities and goals of the Department, its resource needs, and the progress it has made in achieving public health goals.

As a guide for health-planning purposed by public and private health providers, such as hospitals, nursing homes, by provider associations, such as hospital associations, professional associations; and by health and social service organizations, including funding sources, and nonprofit human services agencies.

As a guide for local groups and coalitions of health and health-related providers, and by local human services and other agencies, as for example, public schools, in the development of innovative efforts to provide community assessment, policy development, and assurance.

As a resource for health policy analysts and academicians to devise and evaluate innovative health programs and services.

The Kentucky Public Health Improvement Plan will be considered in health budget decisions.

The Kentucky Public Health Improvement Plan will be used as a measure of the adequacy of funding available for public health purposes.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 344, § 1-3, effective July 15, 1998.

194A.005.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Cabinet” means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services; and

“Secretary” means the secretary for health and family services.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 150, effective June 20, 2005.

194A.010.
Cabinet for Health and Family Services — Functions.

The cabinet is the primary state agency for operating the public health, Medicaid, certificate of need and licensure, and mental health and intellectual disability programs in the Commonwealth. The function of the cabinet is to improve the health of all Kentuckians, including the delivery of population, preventive, reparative, and containment health services in a safe and effective fashion, and to improve the functional capabilities and opportunities of Kentuckians with disabilities. The cabinet is to accomplish its function through direct and contract services for planning and through the state health plan and departmental plans for program operations, for program monitoring and standard setting, and for program evaluation and resource management.

The cabinet is the primary state agency responsible for leadership in protecting and promoting the well-being of Kentuckians through the delivery of quality human services. Recognizing that children are the Commonwealth’s greatest natural resource and that individuals and their families are the most critical component of a strong society, the cabinet shall deliver social services to promote the safety and security of Kentuckians and preserve their dignity. The cabinet shall administer child welfare programs that promote collaboration and accountability among local, public, and private programs to improve the lives of families and children, including collaboration with the Council on Accreditation for Children and Family Services or its equivalent in developing strategies consistent with best practice standards for delivery of services. The cabinet also shall administer income-supplement programs that protect, develop, preserve, and maintain individuals, families, and children in the Commonwealth.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 24, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 141, § 9, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 158, § 13, effective July 12, 2012.

194A.025.
Power and authority of secretary.

The secretary for health and family services and the secretary’s designated representatives in the discharge of the duties of the secretary may administer oaths and affirmations, take depositions, certify official acts, and issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, and other records considered necessary and relevant as evidence at hearings held in connection with the administration of the cabinet.

The secretary may delegate any duties of the office of secretary to employees of the cabinet as the secretary deems necessary and appropriate, unless otherwise prohibited by statutes.

The secretary may enter into any contracts and agreements with individuals, colleges, universities, associations, corporations, municipalities, and other units of government as may be deemed necessary to carry out the general intent and purposes of the cabinet.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 151, effective June 20, 2005.

194A.030.
Major organizational units of cabinet.

The cabinet consists of the following major organizational units, which are hereby created:

Office of the Secretary. Within the Office of the Secretary, there shall be an Office of the Ombudsman and Administrative Review, an Office of Legal Services, an Office of Inspector General, an Office of Public Affairs, an Office of Human Resource Management, an Office of Finance and Budget, an Office of Legislative and Regulatory Affairs, an Office of Administrative Services, and an Office of Application Technology Services, as follows:

The Office of the Ombudsman and Administrative Review shall be headed by an executive director who shall be appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor under KRS 12.050 and shall:

Investigate, upon complaint or on its own initiative, any administrative act of an organizational unit, employee, or contractor of the cabinet, without regard to the finality of the administrative act. Organizational units, employees, or contractors of the cabinet shall not willfully obstruct an investigation, restrict access to records or personnel, or retaliate against a complainant or cabinet employee;

Make recommendations that resolve citizen complaints and improve governmental performance and may require corrective action when policy violations are identified;

Provide evaluation and information analysis of cabinet performance and compliance with state and federal law;

Place an emphasis on research and best practices, program accountability, quality service delivery, and improved governmental performance;

Provide information on how to contact the office for public posting at all offices where Department for Community Based Services employees or contractors work, at any facility where a child in the custody of the cabinet resides, and to all cabinet or contracted foster parents;

Report to the Office of Inspector General for review and investigation any charge or case against an employee of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services where it has cause to believe the employee has engaged in dishonest, unethical, or illegal conduct or practices related to his or her job duties; or any violation of state law or administrative regulation by any organization or individual regulated by, or contracted with the cabinet;

Compile a report of all citizen complaints about programs or services of the cabinet and a summary of resolution of the complaints and submit the report upon request to the Child Welfare Oversight and Advisory Committee established in KRS 6.943, and the Interim Joint Committee on Health and Welfare and Family Services;

Include oversight of administrative hearings; and

Provide information to the Office of the Attorney General, when requested, related to substantiated violations of state law against an employee, a contractor of the cabinet, or a foster or adoptive parent;

The Office of Legal Services shall provide legal advice and assistance to all units of the cabinet in any legal action in which it may be involved. The Office of Legal Services shall employ all attorneys of the cabinet who serve the cabinet in the capacity of attorney, giving legal advice and opinions concerning the operation of all programs in the cabinet. The Office of Legal Services shall be headed by a general counsel who shall be appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor under KRS 12.050 and 12.210. The general counsel shall be the chief legal advisor to the secretary and shall be directly responsible to the secretary. The Attorney General, on the request of the secretary, may designate the general counsel as an assistant attorney general under the provisions of KRS 15.105;

The Office of Inspector General shall be headed by an inspector general who shall be appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor. The inspector general shall be directly responsible to the secretary. The Office of Inspector General shall be responsible for:

The conduct of audits and investigations for detecting the perpetration of fraud or abuse of any program by any client, or by any vendor of services with whom the cabinet has contracted; and the conduct of special investigations requested by the secretary, commissioners, or office heads of the cabinet into matters related to the cabinet or its programs;

Licensing and regulatory functions as the secretary may delegate;

Review of health facilities participating in transplant programs, as determined by the secretary, for the purpose of determining any violations of KRS 311.1911 to 311.1959, 311.1961, and 311.1963;

The duties, responsibilities, and authority pertaining to the certificate of need functions and the licensure appeals functions, pursuant to KRS Chapter 216B; and

The notification and forwarding of any information relevant to possible criminal violations to the appropriate prosecuting authority;

The Office of Public Affairs shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050. The office shall provide information to the public and news media about the programs, services, and initiatives of the cabinet;

The Office of Human Resource Management shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050. The office shall coordinate, oversee, and execute all personnel, training, and management functions of the cabinet. The office shall focus on the oversight, development, and implementation of quality improvement services; curriculum development and delivery of instruction to staff; the administration, management, and oversight of training operations; health, safety, and compliance training; and equal employment opportunity compliance functions;

The Office of Finance and Budget shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050. The office shall provide central review and oversight of budget, contract, and cabinet finances. The office shall provide coordination, assistance, and support to program departments and independent review and analysis on behalf of the secretary;

The Office of Legislative and Regulatory Affairs shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050. The office shall provide central review and oversight of legislation, policy, and administrative regulations. The office shall provide coordination, assistance, and support to program departments and independent review and analysis on behalf of the secretary;

The Office of Administrative Services shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050. The office shall provide central review and oversight of procurement, general accounting including grant monitoring, and facility management. The office shall provide coordination, assistance, and support to program departments and independent review and analysis on behalf of the secretary; and

The Office of Application Technology Services shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050. The office shall provide application technology services including central review and oversight. The office shall provide coordination, assistance, and support to program departments and independent review and analysis on behalf of the secretary;

Department for Medicaid Services. The Department for Medicaid Services shall serve as the single state agency in the Commonwealth to administer Title XIX of the Federal Social Security Act. The Department for Medicaid Services shall be headed by a commissioner for Medicaid services, who shall be appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor under KRS 12.050. The commissioner for Medicaid services shall be a person who by experience and training in administration and management is qualified to perform the duties of this office. The commissioner for Medicaid services shall exercise authority over the Department for Medicaid Services under the direction of the secretary and shall only fulfill those responsibilities as delegated by the secretary;

Department for Public Health. The Department for Public Health shall develop and operate all programs of the cabinet that provide health services and all programs for assessing the health status of the population for the promotion of health and the prevention of disease, injury, disability, and premature death. This shall include but not be limited to oversight of the Division of Women’s Health. The Department for Public Health shall be headed by a commissioner for public health who shall be appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor under KRS 12.050. The commissioner for public health shall be a duly licensed physician who by experience and training in administration and management is qualified to perform the duties of this office. The commissioner shall advise the head of each major organizational unit enumerated in this section on policies, plans, and programs relating to all matters of public health, including any actions necessary to safeguard the health of the citizens of the Commonwealth. The commissioner shall serve as chief medical officer of the Commonwealth. The commissioner for public health shall exercise authority over the Department for Public Health under the direction of the secretary and shall only fulfill those responsibilities as delegated by the secretary;

Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities. The Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities shall develop and administer programs for the prevention of mental illness, intellectual disabilities, brain injury, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse disorders and shall develop and administer an array of services and support for the treatment, habilitation, and rehabilitation of persons who have a mental illness or emotional disability, or who have an intellectual disability, brain injury, developmental disability, or a substance abuse disorder. The Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities shall be headed by a commissioner for behavioral health, developmental and intellectual disabilities who shall be appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor under KRS 12.050. The commissioner for behavioral health, developmental and intellectual disabilities shall be by training and experience in administration and management qualified to perform the duties of the office. The commissioner for behavioral health, developmental and intellectual disabilities shall exercise authority over the department under the direction of the secretary, and shall only fulfill those responsibilities as delegated by the secretary;

Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs. The duties, responsibilities, and authority set out in KRS 200.460 to 200.490 shall be performed by the office. The office shall advocate the rights of children with disabilities and, to the extent that funds are available, shall ensure the administration of services for children with disabilities as are deemed appropriate by this office pursuant to Title V of the Social Security Act. The office may promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A as may be necessary to implement and administer its responsibilities. The duties, responsibilities, and authority of the Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs shall be performed through the office of the executive director. The executive director shall be appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor under KRS 12.050;

Department for Family Resource Centers and Volunteer Services. The Department for Family Resource Centers and Volunteer Services shall streamline the various responsibilities associated with the human services programs for which the cabinet is responsible. This shall include, but not be limited to, oversight of the Division of Family Resource and Youth Services Centers and Serve Kentucky. The Department for Family Resource Centers and Volunteer Services shall be headed by a commissioner who shall be appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor under KRS 12.050. The commissioner for family resource centers and volunteer services shall be by training and experience in administration and management qualified to perform the duties of the office, shall exercise authority over the department under the direction of the secretary, and shall only fulfill those responsibilities as delegated by the secretary;

The Office of Health Data and Analytics shall identify and innovate strategic initiatives to inform public policy initiatives and provide opportunities for improved health outcomes for all Kentuckians through data analytics. The office shall provide leadership in the redesign of the health care delivery system using electronic information technology as a means to improve patient care and reduce medical errors and duplicative services. The office shall facilitate the purchase of individual and small business health insurance coverage for Kentuckians. The office shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor under KRS 12.050;

Department for Community Based Services. The Department for Community Based Services shall administer and be responsible for child and adult protection, violence prevention resources, foster care and adoption, permanency, and services to enhance family self-sufficiency, including child care, social services, public assistance, and family support. The department shall be headed by a commissioner appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050;

Department for Income Support. The Department for Income Support shall be responsible for child support enforcement and disability determination. The department shall serve as the state unit as required by Title II and Title XVI of the Social Security Act, and shall have responsibility for determining eligibility for disability for those citizens of the Commonwealth who file applications for disability with the Social Security Administration. The department shall be headed by a commissioner appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050; and

Department for Aging and Independent Living. The Department for Aging and Independent Living shall serve as the state unit as designated by the Administration on Aging Services under the Older Americans Act and shall have responsibility for administration of the federal community support services, in-home services, meals, family and caregiver support services, elder rights and legal assistance, senior community services employment program, the state health insurance assistance program, state home and community based services including home care, Alzheimer’s respite services and the personal care attendant program, certifications of assisted living facilities, the state Council on Alzheimer’s Disease and other related disorders, and guardianship services. The department shall also administer the Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program and the Medicaid Home and Community Based Waivers Participant Directed Services Option (PDS) Program. The department shall serve as the information and assistance center for aging and disability services and administer multiple federal grants and other state initiatives. The department shall be headed by a commissioner appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 6, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 40, § 2, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 99, § 25, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 172, § 5, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 181, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 24, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 161, § 28, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 146, § 21, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 158, § 14, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 80, § 28, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 92, § 2, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 114, § 3, effective July 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 159, § 2, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 90, § 6, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 9, § 2, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 180, § 5, effective June 29, 2021.

194A.040.
Internal organization of offices and departments — Secretary’s power to create positions — Election of coverage under unemployment insurance.

The secretary shall, subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 12, establish the internal organization of the offices and departments not established in 1974 Ky. Acts ch. 74, Art. VI, or 1998 Ky. Acts ch. 426, and shall organize the cabinet into offices, divisions, regions, districts, and other administrative units as the secretary deems necessary to perform the functions, exercise the powers, and fulfill the duties of the cabinet.

The secretary shall have any and all necessary powers and authority subject to appropriate provisions of the statutes to create positions that enable the cabinet to fulfill all functions assigned to it. The secretary shall designate a person to act as deputy to exercise the duties of the office in case of absence.

The secretary shall, with the approval of the Governor, elect coverage for employees of the cabinet under the unemployment insurance law when required by federal law.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 5, effective July 15, 1998.

194A.050.
Execution of policies, plans, and programs — Administrative regulations — Fees.

The secretary shall formulate, promote, establish, and execute policies, plans, and comprehensive programs and shall adopt, administer, and enforce throughout the Commonwealth all applicable state laws and all administrative regulations necessary under applicable state laws to protect, develop, and maintain the health, personal dignity, integrity, and sufficiency of the individual citizens of the Commonwealth and necessary to operate the programs and fulfill the responsibilities vested in the cabinet. The secretary shall promulgate, administer, and enforce those administrative regulations necessary to implement programs mandated by federal law, or to qualify for the receipt of federal funds and necessary to cooperate with other state and federal agencies for the proper administration of the cabinet and its programs.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the secretary shall have authority to establish by administrative regulation a schedule of reasonable fees. The total fees for permitting and inspection:
(2) (a)

Except as otherwise provided by law, the secretary shall have authority to establish by administrative regulation a schedule of reasonable fees. The total fees for permitting and inspection:

Shall be the total of the operational and administrative costs of the programs to the cabinet and to agencies as defined in KRS 211.185;

Beginning on March 17, 2020 until December 31, 2020, shall not increase more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the fee amount on March 17, 2020; and

Beginning on or after January 1, 2021, shall not increase more than five percent (5%) for each year thereafter.

The fees shall cover the costs of annual inspections of efforts regarding compliance with program standards administered by the cabinet.

All fees collected for inspections shall be deposited in the State Treasury and credited to a revolving fund account to be used for administration of those programs of the cabinet. The balance of the account shall lapse to the general fund at the end of each biennium. Fees shall not be charged for investigation of complaints.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 406, § 25, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 26, effective June 20, 2005; 2017 ch. 80, § 17, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 136, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 21, § 4, effective March 17, 2020; 2020 ch. 36, § 7, effective July 15, 2020.

194A.055.
Kentucky Health Care Improvement Fund — Purpose — Source of moneys — Strategic plan for fund distribution — Annual report and audit.

There is established in the State Treasury a fund to be known as the “Kentucky Health Care Improvement Fund.” This fund shall exist for the purpose of receipt and expenditure of moneys to improve health care and access to health insurance residents of the Commonwealth. The fund may receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds and shall be disbursed by the State Treasury upon the warrant of the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services. Beginning July 1, 2000, twenty-five percent (25%) of the proceeds from the tobacco settlement agreement fund shall be deposited in this fund as provided under KRS 248.654. All investment income earned from moneys deposited in the fund shall accrue to the fund. The moneys in the fund shall not lapse at the close of any fiscal year but shall be carried forward in the next fiscal year for the purpose of the fund. The board shall develop and oversee the implementation of a strategic plan. The strategic plan shall identify both short-term and long-term goals and the appropriate oversights to measure progress toward achievement of those goals, and it shall be updated every two (2) years. The board shall submit an annual report to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission by September 1 of each year for the preceding fiscal year, outlining its activities and expenditures. The Auditor of Public Accounts, on an annual basis, shall conduct a thorough review of all expenditures from the fund and, if necessary in the opinion of the Auditor, an audit of the operations of the fund. No money in the fund shall be allocated until the board has adopted a strategic plan.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 546, § 4, effective April 26, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 152, effective June 20, 2005.

194A.060.
Confidentiality of record and reports.

The secretary shall develop and promulgate administrative regulations that protect the confidential nature of all records and reports of the cabinet that directly or indirectly identify a client or patient or former client or patient of the cabinet and that insure that these records are not disclosed to or by any person except as, and insofar as:

The person identified or the guardian, if any, shall give consent; or

Disclosure may be permitted under state or federal law.

The cabinet shall share pertinent information from within the agency’s records on clients, current and former clients, recipients, and patients as may be permitted by federal and state confidentiality statutes and regulations governing release of data with other public, quasi-public, and private agencies involved in providing services to current or former clients or patients subject to confidentiality agreements as permitted by federal and state law if those agencies demonstrate a direct, tangible, and legitimate interest in the records. In all instances, the individual’s right to privacy is to be respected.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 7, effective July 15, 1998.

194A.062.
Criminal background investigation required for cabinet’s employees with access to or use of federal tax information and front-line staff.

Each employee of the cabinet, including contract staff, with access to or use of federal tax information shall submit to a criminal background investigation by means of a fingerprint check by the Department of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

Front-line staff, as defined in KRS 194A.065, shall submit to national and state fingerprint-supported criminal background checks by the Department of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

The results of the national and state criminal background checks shall be sent to the cabinet.

The cabinet may register employees, contract staff, or front-line staff in the rap back system.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 97, § 1, effective March 21, 2017; 2020 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

194A.065.
Recording of data elements for centralized criminal history record information system — Definition of front-line staff.

For the purposes of this section, “front-line staff” means an employee of the Division of Service Regions of the Department for Community Based Services or the immediate supervisor of an employee whose professional duties include ongoing adult or child protective services, protective services investigations or assessments, or regularly conducting interviews, visits, contacts, or providing transportation services or other services in the homes of family members involved in adult or child protective services.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Department of Corrections, the Administrative Office of the Courts, and the Department of Kentucky State Police shall be responsible for the recording of those data elements that are needed for the development of the centralized criminal history record information system.

The database shall at a minimum contain the information required in KRS 27A.310 to 27A.440.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall provide access to the Department of Kentucky State Police, the Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice, and the Administrative Office of the Courts to its database.

The cabinet secretary and the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall establish communications, policies, and procedures to enable designated cabinet staff of the Department for Community Based Services who are working on a protective services investigation or an ongoing protective services case to request a state criminal background check, and within a reasonable time frame, but no later than one (1) hour after receipt of a request, to have the state criminal background check sent to designated cabinet staff. Designated cabinet staff may request a state criminal background check at any time for a protective services investigation and may use the state criminal background check to assess staff safety concerns.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall prioritize the safety needs of the front-line staff of the Department for Community Based Services and provide improvements in accordance with this section and KRS 194A.562, 194A.564, and 605.170.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 18, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 153, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 140, § 2, effective April 5, 2007; 2007, ch. 85, § 217, effective June 26, 2007.

194A.070.
Utilizing community resources for delivery of services.

The cabinet is authorized to utilize and promote available or potential community resources for the delivery of services and shall, when it deems appropriate, contract for services with local, community, and private agencies when services would not otherwise be available without cost. The cabinet and local, community, and private agencies operating on contract with the cabinet may charge for services rendered when this would be in accordance with applicable state law.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 8, effective July 15, 1998.

194A.080.
Cost-allocation plan.

The secretary shall arrange for the development of a cost allocation plan by the cabinet. The cost allocation shall be developed in accordance with generally recognized accounting practices and shall make provisions for the distribution of operational and administrative costs of all organizational units of the cabinet to all programs operated by the cabinet that receive services or are otherwise benefited by the operations of those organizational units.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 9, effective July 15, 1998.

194A.085.
Governor’s Office of Wellness and Physical Activity — Duties, rights, and responsibilities. [Repealed.]

194A.090.
Citizen advisory bodies — Public Health Services Advisory Council — Institute for Aging. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 426, § 10, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 6, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 27, effective June 20, 2005; 2017 ch. 80, § 18, effective June 29, 2017; repealed by 2018 ch. 112, § 19, effective July 14, 2018.

194A.092.
Division of Child Abuse and Domestic Violence Services. [Repealed.]

194A.095.
Division of Women’s Health — Receipt of gifts, grants, and bequests.

There is created in the Cabinet for Health and Family Services a Division of Women’s Health for the purpose of:

Serving as a repository for data and information affecting women’s physical and mental health issues;

Analyzing and communicating trends in women’s health issues and mental health;

Recommending to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services data elements affecting women’s physical and mental health. The division shall advise and direct which data elements should be collected, analyzed, and reported in a timely manner under KRS 216.2920 to 216.2929;

Cooperating and collaborating with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services in receiving and disseminating through all forms of media including the Internet relevant aggregate data findings under KRS 216.2920 to 216.2929 which affect women; and

Planning, developing, and administering a Women’s Health Resource Center within the Cabinet for Health and Family Services to focus on targeted preventive care and comprehensive health education.

The division may accept gifts, grants, and bequests in support of its mission and duties specified in subsection (1) of this section. All money received shall be administered by the cabinet, which shall administer these funds through appropriate trust and agency accounts.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 427, § 11, effective July 15, 1998; 2001, ch. 74, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2002, ch. 238, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 99, § 154, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 158, § 15, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 80, § 29, effective June 29, 2017.

194A.097.
Division of Family Resource and Youth Services Centers — Administrative regulations.

The Division of Family Resource and Youth Services Centers shall promulgate administrative regulations to:

Implement requirements for applications for continuation funding of a family resource or youth services center; and

Establish a continuing education program for coordinators and staff.

History.
Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 120, § 4, effective July 15, 2008.

194A.099.
Division of Health Benefit Exchange to administer the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act of 2010 — Powers and duties — Administrative regulations — Office not to establish procedures and rules that conflict with the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act.

The Division of Health Benefit Exchange shall administer the provisions of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act of 2010, Pub. L. No. 111-148.

The Division of Health Benefit Exchange shall:

Facilitate enrollment in health coverage and the purchase and sale of qualified health plans in the individual market;

Facilitate the ability of eligible individuals to receive premium tax credits and cost-sharing reductions and enable eligible small businesses to receive tax credits, in compliance with all applicable federal and state laws and regulations;

Oversee the consumer assistance programs of navigators, in-person assisters, certified application counselors, and insurance agents as appropriate;

At a minimum, carry out the functions and responsibilities required pursuant to 42 U.S.C. sec. 18031 to implement and comply with federal regulations in accordance with 42 U.S.C. sec. 18041; and

Regularly consult with stakeholders in accordance with 45 C.F.R. sec. 155.130.

The office may enter into contracts and other agreements with appropriate entities, including but not limited to federal, state, and local agencies, as permitted under 45 C.F.R. sec. 155.110, to the extent necessary to carry out the duties and responsibilities of the office, provided that the agreements incorporate adequate protections with respect to the confidentiality of any information to be shared.

The office shall pursue all available federal funding for the further development and operation of the Division of Health Benefit Exchange.

The Office of Health Data and Analytics shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section.

The office shall not establish procedures and rules that conflict with or prevent the application of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act of 2010, Pub. L. No. 111-148.

HISTORY:
2019 ch. 90, § 3, effective June 27, 2019.

194A.101.
Division of Analytics created in the Office of Health Data and Analytics — Duties and responsibilities — Review of data requests — Administrative regulations.

The Division of Analytics is hereby created in the Office of Health Data and Analytics. The division shall provide oversight and strategic direction and be responsible for coordinating the data analysis initiatives for the various departments that regulate health care and social services to ensure that policy is consistent with the long-term goals across the Commonwealth.

The division shall have the authority to review all data requests received by the cabinet from the public, review the requests for content to determine the cabinet’s response, and approve the release of the requested information. The division shall review data analyses conducted by the departments within the cabinet to ensure the consistency, quality, and validity of the analysis prior to its use in operational and policy decisions. The division shall facilitate the process of data integration by initiating and maintaining data-sharing agreements in order to improve inter-agency and cross-cabinet collaboration.

The Office of Health Data and Analytics shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section.

HISTORY:
2019 ch. 90, § 4, effective June 27, 2019.